Florida, session 2026, SB1016.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 22 23 Section 1.âSection 409.9041, Florida Statutes, is created 24 to read: 25 409.9041âWorking People with Disabilities program.â 26 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âdepartmentâ means 27 the Department of Children and Families. 28 (2)âThe Working People with Disabilities program is 29 established within the agency. The purpose of the program is to 30 eliminate barriers to employment by allowing certain working 31 individuals with disabilities to maintain eligibility for 32 Medicaid home and community-based services waiver programs while 33 working and earning additional income. 34 (3)âAn individual is eligible for the program if he or she 35 meets all of the following criteria: 36 (a)âHas a developmental disability as defined in s. 37 393.063. 38 (b)âIs currently enrolled in a Medicaid home and community 39 based services waiver program, including the home and community 40 based services Medicaid waiver program under s. 393.0662, the 41 familial dysautonomia waiver program authorized under s. 42 409.912(10), the long-term care managed care program under s. 43 409.978, the pilot program for individuals with developmental 44 disabilities under s. 409.9855, or the Florida Medicaid Model 45 Waiver. 46 (c)âIs at least 18 years of age. 47 (d)âIs employed and earning income. 48 (4)âTo maintain Medicaid eligibility, the enrolleeâs 49 maximum monthly income may not exceed 550 percent of the 50 Supplemental Security Income Federal Benefit Rate established by 51 the Social Security Administration. The agency and department 52 shall disregard assets up to $13,000 for an enrollee and up to 53 $24,000 for an enrollee and his or her spouse, and exclude an 54 enrolleeâs assets held in a retirement account recognized by the 55 Internal Revenue Service, when determining eligibility for the 56 Medicaid program. 57 (5)âThe department shall provide written notice to eligible 58 adults upon initial enrollment in a waiver program described in 59 paragraph (3)(b) and at least annually thereafter. The notice 60 must clearly and concisely communicate all of the following 61 information with the option to opt into the program: 62 (a)âEligibility and qualifications for participation in the 63 program. 64 (b)âThe enrolleeâs ability to maintain Medicaid benefits 65 while earning income under the program. 66 (c)âThe optional nature of participation in the program. 67 (d)âA brief overview of a special needs trust authorized by 68 the federal Social Security Act and how it may assist with 69 maintaining eligibility for benefits. 70 (e)âThe name and contact information for the person or 71 office within the department responsible for providing 72 information regarding eligibility for or assistance with the 73 program. 74 (6)âThe agency shall identify Medicaid recipients who are 75 enrolled in a Supplemental Security Income program and a 76 Medicaid home and community-based services waiver program listed 77 in paragraph (3)(b) and share such information with the 78 department as necessary to accomplish the purpose of this 79 section. 80 Section 2.âThe Department of Children and Families shall 81 provide the written notice required under s. 409.9041(5), 82 Florida Statutes, to currently eligible enrollees under s. 83 409.9041(3), Florida Statutes, within 90 days after the 84 effective date of this act. 85 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.